Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 2 Commission, Oath, And Bond
21-2-703. Coverage in lieu of statutory bonds.

The fidelity bond coverage provided under this subchapter shall be in lieu of all statutorily required bonds for the various public officers, officials, and employees participating in the Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program.

The various laws specifically requiring surety bonds or blanket bonds for the respective public officials, officers, and employees shall not be applicable so long as the fidelity bonds as provided in this subchapter are in effect covering the officials, officers, and employees.

In the event coverage shall cease to be provided for any or all of the officials, officers, or employees pursuant to this subchapter, the laws currently in effect providing for surety bonds or blanket bonds shall again become applicable to the officials, officers, and employees.

This coverage shall not include compensatory, punitive, or exemplary damages, and no interest or penalty amounts shall accrue on a bond claim made pursuant to this subchapter including, but not limited to, investigative expenses, legal fees, or court costs.

The fidelity bond coverage provided by the program shall not cover a loss sustained by a participating governmental entity as a result of:

Liability imposed upon or assumed by the participating governmental entity to exonerate or indemnify an official or employee from or against liability incurred by the official or employee in the performance of duties;

Damages for which the participating governmental entity is legally liable as a result of:

The deprivation or violation of a civil right of any person by an official or employee; or

The tortious conduct of an official or employee, except conversion of property of another party held by the participating governmental entity in any capacity; or

Loss of property other than money and securities unless the participating governmental entity or Arkansas Legislative Audit shall be able to designate the specific official or employee causing such loss.

Fidelity bond coverage shall not cover a loss sustained by any party other than a participating governmental entity.

Except as provided in subdivision (d)(3) of this section, in case of a loss alleged to have been caused to a participating governmental entity through any fraudulent or dishonest act or acts by an official or employee covered under the fidelity bond coverage afforded under the provisions of this subchapter, when the participating governmental entity or Arkansas Legislative Audit shall be unable to designate the specific official or employee causing the loss, the participating governmental entity shall nevertheless have the benefit of fidelity bond coverage.

For valid coverage under the program, each participating governmental entity, including each segment or component of the participating governmental entity for which coverage is available under the program, shall procure an audit of its books and records for each fiscal year.

If a participating governmental entity, or covered segment or component of the participating governmental entity, is not audited by Arkansas Legislative Audit, the participating governmental entity, or covered segment or component of the participating governmental entity, shall procure an audit of its books and records by accountants in good standing with the Arkansas State Board of Public Accountancy in accordance with government auditing standards issued by the Comptroller General of the United States.

The audit must be completed within eighteen (18) months of the close of each participating governmental entity's fiscal year.

All audit reports revealing or disclosing unauthorized expenditures, asset shortages, or unaccounted-for funds shall be forwarded immediately upon completion to Arkansas Legislative Audit, the State Risk Manager, and the appropriate prosecuting attorney.

A.C.R.C. Notes. As enacted by Acts 1995, No. 339, § 1, subdivision (g)(1) ended with:

“ending January 1, 1995”.

Amendments. The 2001 amendment redesignated former (b)(1) as present (b)(1)(A) and substituted “the lesser of three … amount of the bond” for “three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) per occurrence.”

The 2005 amendment inserted “of the participating governmental entities” in (b)(1); and added (b)(3).

The Volunteer Council, Arkadelphia Human Development Center, Inc., a non-profit organization formed to benefit the residents and staff of the Arkadelphia Human Development Center, is not a governmental entity as contemplated by this section. Volunteer Council v. Governmental Bonding Bd., 319 Ark. 716, 894 S.W.2d 580 (1995).

The Fidelity Bond Program covers only losses sustained by a participating governmental entity. Volunteer Council v. Governmental Bonding Bd., 319 Ark. 716, 894 S.W.2d 580 (1995).

Subdivision (d)(2)(B) does not provide that fidelity bond coverage shall cover losses sustained by the other parties whose property is converted; rather, the exception provides the fidelity bond coverage shall cover losses of the participating governmental entity under such circumstances. Volunteer Council v. Governmental Bonding Bd., 319 Ark. 716, 894 S.W.2d 580 (1995).

The Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration; and

The Insurance Commissioner, who shall serve as chair.

The board shall also meet at any other time as necessary to carry out its responsibilities and duties, at the call of the chair, or upon the request of a majority of the board.

All action of the board shall be by majority vote of the membership in attendance.

If a board member is unable to attend any board meeting, the member shall appoint a designee to act as his or her representative. The representative shall have all the rights and privileges of the member represented.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “from the Fidelity Bond Trust Fund” for “by the State Insurance Department from funds specifically appropriated to the State Insurance Department for that purpose or from other funds available to the State Insurance Department for paying expense reimbursement” in (b)(2).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education” for “Commissioner of Education” in (a)(3) and (b)(1); and substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a)(4) and (b)(1).

History.

Acts 1987, No. 728, § 14.

21-2-704. Establishment — Scope of coverage.

There is established a Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program for state officials and employees, county officials and employees, municipal officials and employees, and school district officials and employees, to be administered by the Governmental Bonding Board.

(1)The fidelity bond coverage provided by the program shall cover actual losses sustained by a participating governmental entity through any fraudulent or dishonest act or acts committed by any official or employee of the participating governmental entity acting alone or in collusion with another, during the bond period to an amount not exceeding the lesser of three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) or the amount of the bond.

Coverage for loss of property other than money and securities shall be limited to the actual cash value of the property on the day the loss was discovered.

No coverage shall be provided for any claim in which a participating governmental entity through fraudulent means takes money or other property from another participating governmental entity.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 728, §§ 3-5; 1993, No. 319, § 2; 1995, No. 339, § 1; 2001, No. 1383, § 1; 2005, No. 506, § 2; 2007, No. 425, § 1.

21-2-705. Governmental Bonding Board.

There is created the Governmental Bonding Board, which shall be composed of the following five (5) members:

The President of the Association of Arkansas Counties;

The President of the Arkansas Municipal League;

The Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education;

(1)The members of the board shall receive no compensation for their services, but members other than the Commissioner of Elementary and Secondary Education, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, and the Insurance Commissioner may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.

The expense reimbursement of members of the board shall be paid from the Fidelity Bond Trust Fund.

(1)(A)(i)The board shall meet at least quarterly.

However, if there is no proof of loss or other business for the board to consider, the chair may cancel a regularly scheduled quarterly meeting upon written notice to the members.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 728, §§ 6, 7; 1991, No. 188, §§ 1, 2; 1997, No. 250, § 212; 2005, No. 506, § 3; 2019, No. 910, §§ 3491, 3492.

21-2-706. Administration.

It shall be the responsibility of the Governmental Bonding Board to develop and administer the Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program for state officers and employees, state public officials and public employees, and county, municipal, and school district public officials and public employees.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 728, § 8.

21-2-707. Operations and recommendations.

The Insurance Commissioner, at the direction of the Governmental Bonding Board, shall receive and disburse funds necessary for the establishment and operation of the Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program.

The State Risk Manager shall assist in the operations of the program and shall submit to the board recommendations for the establishment of:

Premium schedules for all participating governmental entities;

Schedules for deductible amounts;

Loss histories, loss reporting, and loss payment procedures;

Program enrollments;

Annual review of funds income, balances, and expenditures;

Proposed invitations to bid, and retention levels, if the board determines that excess bonds or reinsurance is necessary; and

Other information required by the board for efficient operation of the program.

To obtain restitution under subsection (b) of this section and as authorized by § 5-4-205, the board shall consider the Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program and the participating governmental entity as victims.

In any criminal prosecution against the official or employee causing the loss, where such official or employee enters a plea of guilty or nolo contendere, or is found guilty following a trial, restitution shall be awarded to the participating governmental entity for the entire amount of its unreimbursed losses and to the program for the entire amount of its payment to the participating governmental entity.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment rewrote (a) and (b).

The 2015 amendment, in (c)(1), substituted “To obtain restitution under” for “For the purpose of obtaining restitution as provided in,” inserted “and as authorized by §5-4-205, the board shall consider” and substituted “as victims” for “shall be deemed victims”.

This section, relating to the Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program, under which the Arkansas Fidelity Bond Trust Fund was created, was recently amended to expressly provide that the Arkansas Fidelity Bond Trust Fund is a victim who is entitled to restitution. In re Sutherland, 161 B.R. 657 (Bankr. E.D. Ark. 1993).

The board may withhold claim determination and a loss payment until the investigation in each case has been completed and all information deemed necessary for determination of coverage under the program has been received.

If the board determines that the loss is covered under the program, then:

The Insurance Commissioner shall authorize fidelity bond loss payments from the Fidelity Bond Trust Fund to the participating governmental entity on a timely basis; and

The board shall:

Provide a timely explanation of a loss payment and a denial of loss to the Legislative Auditor and to the participating governmental entity; and

(a)Determine whether civil remedies should be pursued to recover the loss.

In making a determination under subdivision (a)(2)(B)(ii)(a) of this section, the board shall consider the cost-effectiveness of pursuing civil remedies.

All vouchers for a loss payment shall include as supporting documents a copy of the payment recommendation by the State Risk Manager and a copy of the proof of loss from the Legislative Auditor.

Any loss payment may be adjusted by any applicable deductible, restitution, or coinsurance payment.

Any remainder shall be applied to reimbursement of the program.

If a participating governmental entity fails to pay over an amount due the program under these provisions, the board may deduct any amount due from future loss payments due the applicable participating governmental entity or from any treasury funds of the applicable participating governmental entity.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted the subdivision (1)(A) and (2)(A) designations in (a); inserted (a)(1)(B) and (a)(2)(B); rewrote the first sentence in (b)(1); and deleted former (c).

The 2013 amendment rewrote (a)(2).

The Arkansas Fidelity Bond Trust Fund, which reimbursed a school district for losses caused by an embezzling employee, was the entity entitled to collect the restitution ordered in the judgment of employee's conviction; the fact that the statutorily created bond company was required to reimburse the immediate victim does not obviate the economic loss to the state. In re Sutherland, 161 B.R. 657 (Bankr. E.D. Ark. 1993).

The Fidelity Bond Program covers only losses sustained by a participating governmental entity. Volunteer Council v. Governmental Bonding Bd., 319 Ark. 716, 894 S.W.2d 580 (1995).

The Governmental Bonding Board, with the assistance of the State Insurance Department, shall prepare a billing certification to be remitted to the:

Funds so appropriated for premiums for fidelity bonds for state public officials and employees and state officers and employees or funds otherwise made available for this purpose shall not be subject to reduction as a result of any shortfall of projected revenues; and

Chief Fiscal Officer of the State who shall pay it from funds withheld from the:

County Aid Fund which are due each county participating in the Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program for premiums for fidelity bonds for county public officials and employees;

Municipal Aid Fund which are due each municipality participating in the program for premiums for fidelity bonds for municipal public officials and employees; and

Public School Fund which are due each school district participating in the program for premiums for fidelity bonds for school district officials and employees.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” for “Director” in (a)(1)(A).

Upon receipt of these funds, the Insurance Commissioner shall deposit them in the Fidelity Bond Trust Fund.

There is established on the books of the Treasurer of State, the Auditor of State, and the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State a separate fund to be known as the “Fidelity Bond Trust Fund”.

(1)No money shall be appropriated from the fund for any purpose except for the use and benefit of participating governmental entities for bond claims and for Governmental Bonding Board expenses, including, but not limited to, travel, actuarial, consultant, and service contract fees.

(1)(A)The assets of the fund may be invested and reinvested as the Governmental Bonding Board may determine with the advice of the State Board of Finance.

All incomes derived through investment of the fund shall be credited as investment income to the fund.

For the purposes of investment, fund moneys invested and interest earned on fund moneys invested shall be administered as trust funds pursuant to the provisions of § 19-3-219(a)[repealed].

Further, all moneys deposited to the fund shall not be subject to any deduction, tax, levy, or any other type of assessment.

All moneys received by the Governmental Bonding Board for the Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program, including premiums collected by the Governmental Bonding Board under this subchapter, restitution, interest payments, grants, gifts, and refunds shall be deposited into the fund.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment inserted “travel” in (b)(1); and substituted “All moneys received … gifts, and refunds” for “The bond premiums collected by the Governmental Bonding Board under the provisions of this subchapter” in (d).

A.C.R.C. Notes. Applicants for employment with the state are subject to selective service registration requirements under §6-80-104.

Acts 2015, No. 1068, §1, provided:

“State of Arkansas Workforce Retention Task Force.

“(a)The State of Arkansas Workforce Retention Task Force is created.

“(b)The task force shall consist of the following members:

“(1)One (1) human resources or payroll officer for the Department of Human Services appointed by the Director of the Department of Human Services;

“(2)One (1) human resources or payroll officer for the Department of Health appointed by the Director of the Department of Health;

“(3)One (1) human resources or payroll officer for the Department of Finance and Administration appointed by the Director of the Department of Finance and Administration;

“(4)One (1) human resources or payroll officer from the Department of Parks and Tourism appointed by the Director of the Department of Parks and Tourism;

“(5)One (1) member from the Office of Personnel Management of the Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration appointed by the Personnel Director of the Office of Personnel Management of the Division of Management Services of the Department of Finance and Administration;

“(6)One (1) member from the Arkansas State Employees Association appointed by the Executive Director of the Arkansas State Employees Association;

“(7)(A)Two (2) members appointed by the Governor who are Arkansas state employees.

“(B)One (1) of the two (2) members appointed under subdivision (b)(7)(A) of this section shall be a woman.

“(C)One (1) of the two (2) members appointed under subdivision (b)(7)(A) of this section shall be Hispanic or African American; and

“(8)(A)Two (2) members appointed by the Governor who are retired Arkansas state employees.

“(B)One (1) of the two (2) members appointed under subdivision (b)(8)(A) of this section shall be a woman.

“(C)One (1) of the two (2) members appointed under subdivision (b)(8)(A) of this section shall be Hispanic or African American.

“(c)(1)Members of the task force shall serve until December 31, 2016.

“(2)A vacancy on the task force shall be filled by the appointing authority for the unexpired portion of the term.

“(d)(1)The Governor shall designate one (1) member of the task force to:

“(A)Call the first meeting of the task force to be set no later than thirty (30) days after the effective date of this act; and

“(B)Serve as the chair of the task force.

“(2)The Governor shall designate one (1) member of the task force to serve as the vice chair of the task force.

“(e)A majority of the members of the task force shall constitute a quorum for conducting business of the task force.

“(f)(1)(A)State agencies shall comply with requests of the task force or the Office of Personnel Management to provide data and other assistance for the use of the task force.

“(B)If the task force obtains information that is exempt from disclosure under the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, §25-19-101 et seq., or is otherwise confidential under law, the information shall:

“(i)Remain exempt or confidential while in the possession of the task force; and

“(ii)Not be disclosed except as provided for by law.

“(2)The Arkansas State Employees Association shall provide staff for the task force.

“(g)Members of the task force shall serve without compensation and shall not receive per diem, mileage, or stipends.

“(h)The task force shall:

“(1)Study the steps the state may take to retain state employees in:

“(A)The employing state agency; and

“(B)Other state agencies;

“(2)Consider the steps other public employers have taken to retain their workforce;

“(3)Set a plan of implementation for the study under this section;

“(4)Design a survey instrument to be administered to state agency heads and employees to determine the perceived and actual barriers to retaining state employees;

“(5)Assess the employee retention rates of the state agencies participating in the study and survey; and

“(6)Provide to the Office of Personnel Management the plan of implementation and the survey instrument.

“(i)The Office of Personnel Management shall survey the state agency heads and employees of the following agencies using the survey instrument designed under this section:

“(1)The Department of Human Services;

“(2)The Department of Health;

“(3)The Department of Finance and Administration; and

“(4)The Department of Parks and Tourism.

“(j)Before October 31, 2016, the Personnel Director of the Office of Personnel Management shall report to the task force on the:

“(1)Results of the study; and

“(2)Recommendations for legislation, rules, and policy changes that the state could take to increase state employee workforce retention.

“(k)Before December 31, 2016, the task force shall report to the House Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs and the Senate Committee on State Agencies and Governmental Affairs the results of its findings and activities and of its recommendations.

“(l)The task force shall expire on January 1, 2017.”

Amendments. The 2001 amendment, in (a), substituted “Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 56” for “Constitutional Amendment 56” and substituted “that approximates” for “which approximates”; and deleted “December 31 and” preceding “June 30” in (b)(1).

The person filing the certificate is registered with the Selective Service System in accordance with the Military Selective Service Act; or

The person filing the certificate is not required to register with the Selective Service System because the person is:

Under eighteen (18) years of age;

In the armed forces of the United States on active duty, other than in a reserve or national guard unit;

An alien lawfully admitted to the United States as a nonimmigrant under Section 101(a)(15) of the Immigration and Nationality Act, 8 U.S.C. § 1101, for so long as he or she continues to maintain a lawful nonimmigrant status in the United States;

A permanent resident of the Trust Territory of the Pacific Islands or the Commonwealth of Northern Mariana Islands; or

Excused from registration for other reason provided by federal law and that reason is included in the certificate.

No person who is required to register with the Selective Service System shall be eligible for employment by any agency of the State of Arkansas or for admission to any public institution of higher education unless the person has signed a statement of selective service status.

U.S. Code. The Military Selective Service Act, referred to in (a)(1), is codified generally as 50 U.S.C. § 3801 et seq.

Cross References. Selective Service registration, §6-80-104.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Galchus, Survey of Labor Law, 3 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 251.

The Age Discrimination Prohibition Act contains no declaration of legislative intent to waive the state's sovereign immunity, and nothing in this subchapter subjects the state to liability for monetary damages for violations of this subchapter's provisions. State v. Goss, 344 Ark. 523, 42 S.W.3d 440 (2001).

Cited: Palmer v. Arkansas Council on Econ. Educ., 344 Ark. 461, 40 S.W.3d 784 (2001).

History.

Acts 1987, No. 728, § 10.

21-2-708. Notice and proof of losses — Investigations — Restitution.

The Legislative Auditor, with the approval of the Legislative Joint Auditing Committee, shall give notice and make proof of loss to the Governmental Bonding Board under the Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program on behalf of a public official, officer, or employee when the audit of the records of the public official, officer, or employee reflects unauthorized disbursements or unaccounted-for funds or property for which the public official, officer, or employee may be liable.

If an audit reflects unauthorized disbursements or unaccounted-for funds or property for which a public official, officer, or employee may be liable, then the Legislative Auditor shall request that:

The appropriate prosecuting attorney or the Attorney General assist the state or the appropriate political subdivision in obtaining restitution; and

The appropriate city attorney, county attorney, prosecuting attorney, or the Attorney General assist the state or appropriate political subdivision in filing a civil lawsuit against the public official, officer, or employee if the board determines that civil remedies should be pursued under §21-2-709(a).

History.

Acts 1987, No. 728, § 12; 1993, No. 179, § 2; 1993, No. 319, § 3; 2013, No. 1056, § 1; 2015, No. 231, § 2.

21-2-709. Determination of coverage — Assignment of rights.

(1)(A)Upon the receipt of the proof of loss from the Legislative Auditor, the Governmental Bonding Board shall determine whether the loss is covered under the Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program.

(1)Before any loss payment is paid from the fund, the recipient of the loss payment shall sign and return a transfer of rights form assigning to the fund to the extent of the loss payment all rights and claims that the recipient may have against the official, officer, or employee involved. The fund shall be subrogated to all of the rights of the recipients of the loss payment to the extent of the loss payment.

(A)If the participating governmental entity shall sustain any loss that exceeds the amount of indemnity provided by the program, the participating governmental entity shall be entitled to all recoveries, except from suretyship, insurance, reinsurance, security, or indemnity taken by or for the benefit of the program, by whomever made, on account of the loss until fully reimbursed, less the amount of the deductible and coinsurance.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 728, § 13; 1993, No. 319, § 4; 2005, No. 506, § 4; 2013, No. 1056, § 2.

21-2-710. Billing certification — Payment and deposit.

(A)Department of Finance and Administration. Upon receipt of this certification, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration shall pay it from funds specifically appropriated for it by the General Assembly or from other funds available therefor.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 728, § 11; 2019, No. 910, § 3493.

21-2-711. Fidelity Bond Trust Fund.

The fund shall be administered by and disbursed at the direction of the Governmental Bonding Board.

History.

Acts 1987, No. 728, § 9; 2005, No. 506, § 5.

Subchapter 3

— Municipal Public Employees Blanket Bond Program

Subchapter 4

— County Public Employees Blanket Bond Program

Subchapter 5

— State Public Employees Blanket Bond Program

Subchapter 6

— Public Employees Blanket Bond Program

Subchapter 7

— Self-Insured Fidelity Bond Program